Utah statutes.
70D-2-202.   Form of notice.

(1) (a)  A person required to file notification with the commissioner under Section 70D-2-201 shall file notification with the commissioner:

(i)  at least 30 days before commencing business as a lender, broker, or servicer in this state; and

(ii)  on or before January 31 of each year after filing the notification required under Subsection (1)(a)(i).

(b)  A notification required by this Subsection (1) shall state:

(i)  the name of the person;

(ii)  the name in which the business will be transacted if different from the name in Subsection(1)(b)(i);

(iii)  the address of the person's principal business office, which may be outside this state;

(iv)  the addresses of each office in this state at which the person conducts business as a lender, broker, or servicer;

(v)  if the person conducts business as a lender, broker, or servicer but does not maintain an office in this state, a brief description of the manner in which the business is conducted;

(vi)  the name and address in this state of a designated agent upon whom service of process may be made; and

(vii)  any other information required by the rules of the commissioner.

(2)  If information in a notification becomes inaccurate after filing, a person is not required to notify the commissioner until the earlier of when:

(a)  the person is required to renew the person's notification; or

(b)  the commissioner specifically requests earlier notification.

